Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6738
Convictions; reports required.

On and after July 1, 1999, the clerk of any county court or district court in this state shall report to the department the conviction in such court of any medication aide of any felony or any misdemeanor. The Attorney General or the city prosecutor or county attorney prosecuting any such criminal action shall provide the court with information concerning the registration of the defendant. Notice to the department shall be filed within thirty days after the conviction in a manner agreed to by the department and the State Court Administrator.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 28.